Alabama, session 2026rs, HB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Judge of Probate of Montgomery County
may charge an additional reasonable fee for providing the
service of celebrating the rites of matrimony. The fee
authorized by this section shall be in addition to the fee
imposed pursuant to Section 12-19-90, Code of Alabama 1975,
and shall be retained by the judge of probate or the designee
of the judge who solemnized the marriage.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB432 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2